Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2400.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5211YH (4) 91 sc/js H.F. 2400 Section 1. Section 26.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 1 following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. A governmental entity may use the 3 information provided on the contractor performance assessment 4 system created in section 26.17 to determine if a bidder is 5 responsible. 6 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 26.17 Contractor performance 7 assessment system. 8 1. The department of administrative services shall create 9 and maintain a contractor performance assessment system on 10 an internet site accessible to governmental entities for 11 the purpose of assessing contractor performance on public 12 improvements under this chapter. 13 2. The department of administrative services shall develop 14 for use on the internet site a performance grading system for 15 architects, engineers, and contractors who have performed work 16 on a public improvement in this state. The performance grading 17 system shall be based on performance metrics, including but not 18 limited to all of the following: 19 a. Whether the work was performed in a timely manner. 20 b. Whether the cost exceeded the amount budgeted and, if so, 21 by what amount. 22 c. The history of change orders. 23